dictsource/hu_rules
  kéré) ssz (erű   Ss
rándulá) ssz (erű  Ss
 utalá) ssz (erű   Ss
villaná) ssz (erű  Ss
 hárma) ssz (ám    Ss
 szoro) ssz (erű   Ss
_hente) ssz (ak    Ss
  örgé) ssz (erű   Ss
    hő) ssz (erep  Ss
    hú) ssz (állít Ss
  járá) ssz (olgálat Ss
  járá) ssz (erű   Ss
  irtá) ssz (él    Ss
jelenté) ssz (int  Ss
  karo) ssz (ériá  Ss
katekizmu) ssz (erű Ss
_keríté) ssz (ag   Ss
 _kevé) ssz (er    Ss
  látá) ssz (ög    Ss
nyilatkoztatá) ssz (erű Ss
szögellé) ssz (erű Ss
_kitünteté) ssz    Ss
kommunikáció) ssz (ob Ss
  köle) ssz (em    Ss
 köntö) ssz (erű   Ss
könyöklé) ssz (él  Ss
 _körö) ssz (ig    Ss
 _kőri) ssz        Ss
_küldeté) ssz      Ss
labirintu) ssz (er Ss
lázadá) ssz        Ss
_lejté) ssz        S|s
   üté) ssz (ám    Ss
 málhá) ssz        Ss
 medre) ssz (ék    Ss
 _mela) ssz (ín    s:
 _méne) ssz        Ss
_mesze) ssz (ür    Ss
 _móku) ssz        Ss
 _napo) ssz (ob    Ss
 utazá) ssz (erű   Ss
 nedve) ssz (ürk   Ss
  neme) ssz (ív    Ss
  neme) ssz (őrm   Ss
nyikkaná) ssz (er  Ss
 nyomá) ssz (ab    Ss
  orvo) ssz (áz    Ss
  orvo) ssz (er    Ss
  vodá) ssz (int   Ss
örvénylé) ssz (erű Ss
 párná) ssz (ék    Ss
 _pené) ssz (ín    s:
pedagógu) ssz (ob  Ss
pirami) ssz (erű   Ss
_pirító) ssz (e    Ss
_piszko) ssz       Ss
pisztolylövé) ssz (erű Ss
 rádió) ssz (erep  Ss
 rántá) ssz (erű   Ss
repülő) ssz (árny  Ss
   _ré) ssz (erű   Ss
_rózsá) ssz (ők    Ss
  ruhá) ssz (ekere Ss
selyme) ssz (őke   Ss
 sérté) ssz (ám    Ss
borzongá) ssz (erű S|s
sikoltá) ssz (erű  Ss
  _sor) ssz (eszély Ss
suhogá) ssz (erű   Ss
 _suva) ssz (a     s:
 tálto) ssz (árny  Ss
szórakozá) ssz (ám Ss
 szúró) ssz (em    Ss
 támlá) ssz (ék    Ss
társalgá) ssz (ámba Ss
templomo) ssz (ak  Ss
_tigri) ssz        Ss
 _típu) ssz (ám    Ss
 _típu) ssz (öveg  Ss
tizede) ssz (állás Ss
 tölté) ssz (ab    Ss
 tölté) ssz (erű   Ss
 ulánu) ssz (ázad  Ss
utasítá) ssz (erű  Ss
   uta) ssz (int   Ss
   uta) ssz (olg   Ss
ügyelete) ssz (ob  Ss
_vallomá) ssz      Ss
 _váro) ssz (él    Ss
  vére) ssz (áj    Ss
  vere) ssz (őke   Ss
 vérte) ssz (ázad  Ss
vörhenye) ssz (őke Ss
 _vörö) ssz        Ss
zavaro) ssz (ür    Ss
_nesze) ssz (er    s
     a) ssz (isztens s
    ka) ssz (íroz  s
    _e) ssz (enci  s
bégeté) ssz (erű   Ss
     a) ssz (isztál s
  piro) ssz (ka    s
  ágyú) ssz        Ss
  _alá) ssz (olg   Ss
  almá) ssz (ürk   Ss
csárdá) ssz (ól    Ss
 csikó) ssz        Ss
   éde) ssz (ül    Ss
   éke) ssz (ó     Ss
föléle) ssz (em    s:
 frázi) ssz (erű   Ss
fuvaro) ssz (ekér  Ss
  fúvó) ssz (ersz  Ss
   ver) ssz (erz   Ss
 _gyor) ssz        Ss
   _ki) ssz (állá  Ss
 _hajó) ssz        Ss
  _hár) ssz        Ss
 _hasi) ssz (ag    Ss
 _hatá) ssz (er    Ss
 _heku) ssz (ag    Ss
_hízelkedé) ssz    Ss
_horkantá) ssz (er Ss
   _hő) ssz        Ss
   _hú) ssz (ín    Ss
   _hú) ssz (iget  Ss
  hűvö) ssz (emű   Ss
  _ina) ssz        Ss
_forrá) ssz        Ss
_jáspi) ssz (ob    Ss
   _jó) ssz        Ss
_kacagá) ssz (er   Ss
  kapu) ssz        Ss
    má) ssz (er    Ss
 _kevé) ssz        Ss
    ki) ssz (eb    Ss
    ki) ssz (ed    Ss
 kormo) ssz        Ss
 köntö) ssz        Ss
könyve) ssz        Ss
 farka) ssz (ürk   Ss
    hú) ssz (aft   Ss
kihívá) ssz        Ss
lőszere) ssz       Ss
  lövé) ssz (erű   Ss
fehére) ssz (ürk   Ss
köhinté) ssz (erű  Ss
   kva) ssz (iakér s:
nyeríté) ssz (erű  Ss
lőporo) ssz        Ss
kapará) ssz (erű   Ss
nyávogá) ssz (erű  Ss
 szoká) ssz (ám    Ss
 borza) ssz (őr    Ss
 harco) ssz        S|s
 kocsi) ssz (erep  Ss
vitorlá) ssz       Ss
 mágná) ssz        Ss
    má) ssz (őr    Ss
 mécse) ssz        Ss
téveszté) ssz (erű Ss
  méhe) ssz        Ss
 dörgé) ssz        Ss
muzsiku) ssz       Ss
  oázi) ssz (erű   Ss
 _orda) ssz        Ss
  állá) ssz        Ss
  ősze) ssz        Ss
     ő) ssz (árm   Ss
    _ő) ssz (ell   Ss
    _ő) ssz (i     Ss
    _ő) ssz (ék    Ss
    _ő) ssz (erű   Ss
     ő) ssz (arv   Ss
    _ő) ssz (oká   Ss
     ő) ssz (örny  Ss
     ő) ssz (ülő   Ss
papiro) ssz        Ss
papriká) ssz       Ss
   plü) ss (zs     S
_portá) ssz        Ss
 _raká) ssz        Ss
 rántá) ssz        Ss
 _rava) ssz        s:
keríté) ssz        Ss
repülő) ssz (trájk Ss
 rezgé) ssz (ám    Ss
_rongyo) ssz       Ss
  ruhá) ssz (ob    Ss
   _sá) ssz        Ss
_sorva) ssz        s:
sugárzá) ssz       Ss
szindikátu) ssz    Ss
_szólá) ssz        Ss
 szőrö) ssz (ív    Ss
  _tár) ssz (ob    Ss
   tár) ssz (omszéd Ss
   teá) ssz (erv   Ss
  tövi) ssz        Ss
tubáko) ssz (el    Ss
_tükrö) ssz        Ss
  tüze) ssz (em    Ss
 pótlá) ssz        Ss
vallatá) ssz (er   Ss
 _váro) ssz        Ss
 _vere) ssz        Ss
 _veté) ssz        Ss
világo) ssz        Ss
villamo) ssz       Ss
 rángá) ssz (er    Ss
 zölde) ssz (ürk   Ss
 zsíro) ssz (áj    Ss
zsoldo) ssz        Ss
  bázi) ssz        Ss
 _kapo) ssz        Ss
_agyago) ssz (erg  Ss
 _béké) ssz        Ss
_gombo) ssz        Ss
_kemene) ssz       Ss
 _miko) ssz        Ss
 _neme) ssz        Ss
_szamo) ssz        Ss
_szilvá) ssz       Ss
 _vámo) ssz        Ss
keresé) ssz        Ss
  cipő) ssz        Ss
szorongá) ssz      Ss
alkalmazá) ssz     Ss
 kezdé) ssz        Ss
  edzé) ssz        Ss
  egye) ssz (ám    Ss
felsorolá) ssz     Ss
        ssz (ürk   Ss
        ssz (őke   Ss
formán) ssz (int   Ss
  hami) ssz (ín    Ss
 mászá) ssz (erű   Ss
 hárma) ssz        Ss
  hívá) ssz        Ss
hivatkozá) ssz     Ss
  leve) ssz (üks       Ss
   _hú) ssz (öv    Ss
ismétlé) ssz       Ss
  járá) ssz        Ss
kattintá) ssz      Ss
   _ki) ssz (öv    Ss
közlekedé) ssz     Ss
  laká) ssz        Ss
 légzé) ssz        Ss
   le) ssz (ab    Ss
meglepeté) ssz     Ss
 nyila) ssz        Ss
pszichológu) ssz   Ss
  ráko) ssz        Ss
 ritmu) ssz        Ss
 rúzso) ssz        Ss
 stílu) ssz        Ss
  víru) ssz        Ss
szállodá) ssz      Ss
  taxi) ssz        Ss
  ugrá) ssz        Ss
üstökö) ssz        Ss
visszaélé) ssz     Ss
   esé) ssz (erű   Ss
  webe) ssz        Ss
beleve) ssz (en    s:
tengeré) ssz (ürk  s:
hirdeté) ssz       S|s
   _ki) ssz (éri   S|s
   _ki) ssz (ersz  S|s
 _fűté) ssz        S|s
_kontaktu) ssz     S|s
  _dió) ssz (ilá   S|s
_konszenzu) ssz    S|s
 forgá) ssz (er    S|s
mérkőzé) ssz       S|s
művelődé) ssz      S|s
_nyomá) ssz (in    S|s
  _oko) ssz        S|s
oktatá) ssz (er    S|s
pszichózi) ssz     S|s
realitá) ssz       S|s
szerződé) ssz      S|s
születé) ssz (ám   S|s
 tölté) ssz (ak    S|s
 utazá) ssz (er    S|s
zsarolá) ssz (er   S|s
  dőlé) ssz (ab    S|s
települé) ssz (isz Ss
vallá) ssz Ss
folyá) ssz (er Ss
_katyva) ssz s:
mitugrá) ssz (al s:
basszu) ssz Ss
buká) ssz Ss
erőlködé) ssz Ss
szarva) ssz Ss
ricinu) ssz Ss
települé) ssz Ss
utalá) ssz Ss
erősíté) ssz Ss
fázi) ssz Ss
fejleszté) ssz Ss
fúvó) ssz Ss
autó) ssz Ss
nyomá) ssz Ss
hatá) ssz Ss
effektu) ssz Ss
pulzu) ssz Ss
jelenté) ssz Ss
váltá) ssz Ss
mondá) ssz Ss
fázá) ssz Ss
ve) ssz (ők s:
_ő) ssz (láv Ss
periódu) ssz Ss
pólu) ssz Ss
rová) ssz Ss
utasítá) ssz Ss
tudá) ssz Ss
turizmu) ssz Ss
hajó) ssz (leng Ss
vezeté) ssz Ss
_vonó) ssz (iv Ss
ülé) ssz Ss
motoro) ssz Ss
adá) ssz Ss
adó) ssz Ss
aktivitá) ssz Ss
akusztiku) ssz Ss
arco) ssz Ss
alkotá) ssz Ss
állomá) ssz Ss
típu) ssz Ss
analízi) ssz Ss
anyó) ssz Ss
áramlá) ssz Ss
emelkedé) ssz Ss
árré) ssz Ss
árveré) ssz Ss
áttöré) ssz Ss
autizmu) ssz Ss
autoritá) ssz Ss
metszé) ssz Ss
mutatkozá) ssz Ss
blue) ssz (al s:
blue) ssz Ss
bombázá) ssz Ss
bukfencezé) ssz Ss
bunyó) ssz Ss
büfögé) ssz Ss
carie) ssz Ss
ciklu) ssz Ss
cipru) ssz Ss
ciripelé) ssz Ss
citru) ssz Ss
csevegé) ssz Ss
csicsergé) ssz Ss
diakónu) ssz Ss
díjszabá) ssz Ss
dinamiku) ssz Ss
dobolá) ssz Ss
dózi) ssz Ss
dzsidá) ssz Ss
egymá) ssz Ss
elbeszélé) ssz Ss
elektroniku) ssz Ss
ellátá) ssz Ss
eltolá) ssz Ss
emigrán) ssz Ss
éneke) ssz Ss
epilógu) ssz Ss
építé) ssz (ab Ss
erőforrá) ssz Ss
erszénye) ssz Ss
érvelé) ssz Ss
esé) ssz Ss
észlelé) ssz Ss
evező) ssz Ss
evolven) ssz Ss
fagyá) ssz Ss
fá) ssz (er Ss
dísze) ssz Ss
fejlődé) ssz Ss
fékezé) ssz Ss
lángolá) ssz Ss
feltevé) ssz Ss
felvoná) ssz Ss
féti) ssz Ss
foga) ssz Ss
fordítá) ssz Ss
fotó) ssz Ss
földmíve) ssz Ss
földműve) ssz Ss
rengé) ssz Ss
főzé) ssz Ss
fuvaro) ssz Ss
hú) ssz (er Ss
gerjeszté) ssz Ss
gesztu) ssz Ss
szűré) ssz Ss
gulyá) ssz Ss
gyártá) ssz Ss
gyülekezé) ssz Ss
gyűlé) ssz Ss
hajtá) ssz Ss
hangzá) ssz Ss
hányado) ssz Ss
háztartá) ssz Ss
hente) ssz Ss
hitelesíté) ssz Ss
hivatá) ssz Ss
horga) ssz Ss
horkolá) ssz Ss
hú) ssz (ál Ss
hú) ssz (ekt Ss
hú) ssz (eml Ss
hú) ssz (int Ss
hú) ssz (örny Ss
hú) ssz (üksé Ss
hűté) ssz Ss
identitá) ssz Ss
igazgatá) ssz Ss
inciden) ssz Ss
indítá) ssz Ss
intriku) ssz Ss
írá) ssz Ss
játéko) ssz Ss
jelölé) ssz Ss
jézu) ssz Ss
júdá) ssz Ss
kaka) ssz Ss
kántálá) ssz Ss
kapacitá) ssz Ss
kapitalizmu) ssz Ss
karbantartá) ssz Ss
kárpito) ssz Ss
ver) ssz (er Ss
kerékpáro) ssz Ss
döfé) ssz Ss
ké) ssz (án Ss
ké) ssz (ár Ss
ké) ssz (er Ss
kette) ssz Ss
kézműve) ssz Ss
kidolgozá) ssz Ss
kifejezé) ssz Ss
ki) ssz (eke Ss
ro) ssz (abb s:
konfliktu) ssz Ss
konstan) ssz Ss
kontinen) ssz Ss
kóro) ssz (en Ss
kortár) ssz Ss
kóru) ssz Ss
_ko) ssz (er Ss
köle) ssz Ss
könyve) ssz (é s:
könyvtáro) ssz Ss
körö) ssz (e Ss
kőrö) ssz (eg Ss
kreativitá) ssz Ss
krízi) ssz Ss
kubiko) ssz Ss
kulturáli) ssz Ss
kurzu) ssz Ss
kutatá) ssz Ss
labirintu) ssz Ss
lakato) ssz Ss
lángo) ssz Ss
ömlé) ssz Ss
lebegé) ssz Ss
leképezé) ssz Ss
nyúlá) ssz Ss
rohaná) ssz Ss
levelezé) ssz Ss
fo) ssz (ín Ss
libbené) ssz Ss
likviditá) ssz Ss
lobbaná) ssz Ss
lövé) ssz (ám Ss
lövöldözé) ssz Ss
maga) ssz (int Ss
magatartá) ssz Ss
mágu) ssz Ss
érzé) ssz Ss
jegyzé) ssz (er Ss
lepé) ssz (er Ss
művelé) ssz Ss
megoldá) ssz Ss
rendelé) ssz Ss
megtorlá) ssz Ss
méhka) ssz (er Ss
mellka) ssz Ss
mentő) ssz Ss
mérgezé) ssz Ss
mestersége) ssz Ss
meteorológu) ssz Ss
mósu) ssz (er Ss
mután) ssz Ss
működé) ssz Ss
náda) ssz Ss
négye) ssz Ss
nyaralá) ssz Ss
nyögé) ssz Ss
oktatá) ssz Ss
olvasá) ssz Ss
órá) ssz Ss
orgazmu) ssz Ss
gyilko) ssz Ss
orvo) ssz Ss
ölelé) ssz Ss
ellenőrzé) ssz Ss
önkénte) ssz Ss
öntözé) ssz Ss
összeomlá) ssz Ss
ötvö) ssz Ss
pálo) ssz (en Ss
lámpá) ssz Ss
pazarlá) ssz Ss
pedagógu) ssz Ss
pesti) ssz Ss
pirami) ssz Ss
postá) ssz Ss
pörsené) ssz Ss
pré) ssz (ak Ss
prímá) ssz Ss
prioritá) ssz Ss
próbálkozá) ssz Ss
ré) ssz (ele Ss
részesedé) ssz Ss
reziden) ssz Ss
rítu) ssz Ss
robbaná) ssz Ss
robbantá) ssz Ss
röfögé) ssz Ss
rögtönzé) ssz Ss
rugó) ssz Ss
sakkozá) ssz Ss
sa) ssz (ikl Ss
sa) ssz (imb Ss
sa) ssz (obr Ss
sa) ssz (obor Ss
sercegé) ssz Ss
_sor) ssz (ab Ss
sörha) ssz Ss
száza) ssz Ss
szedé) ssz Ss
széle) ssz Ss
játszá) ssz Ss
szintetiku) ssz Ss
dobbaná) ssz Ss
szociáli) ssz Ss
szolgáltatá) ssz Ss
szövé) ssz Ss
taktu) ssz Ss
tanulá) ssz Ss
tapsolá) ssz Ss
társulá) ssz Ss
teknő) ssz  Ss
telje) ssz  Ss
teremté) ssz Ss
terhe) ssz Ss
termé) ssz Ss
tervezé) ssz Ss
tetoválá) ssz Ss
textu) ssz Ss
tizede) ssz Ss
tölté) ssz Ss
töré) ssz Ss
trombitálá) ssz Ss
trónu) ssz Ss
tűré) ssz Ss
tüsszögé) ssz Ss
unikorni) ssz Ss
uta) ssz Ss
uzsorá) ssz Ss
űrhajó) ssz Ss
ütközé) ssz Ss
vágá) ssz Ss
ütő) ssz Ss
választá) ssz Ss
vállalkozá) ssz Ss
varrá) ssz Ss
esztergályo) ssz Ss
verbunko) ssz Ss
versengé) ssz Ss
villámlá) ssz Ss
vívá) ssz Ss
bizto) ssz Ss
vonaglá) ssz Ss
voná) ssz Ss
zaklatá) ssz Ss
zászló) ssz Ss
zöldsége) ssz Ss
emlő) ssz (erű Ss
kapá) ssz (őlő Ss
kuva) ssz (al s:
szertartá) ssz (erű Ss
csipogá) ssz Ss
vadá) ssz s:
degre) ssz s:
